The National Archives
(C) crown copyright
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189
Image Reference:57

Canaris according to ISOS sources arrived
in N. Africa on the 17th April and has
visited Tangier and Tetuan and has also
seen his chief representative in Casablanca
His visit to Algeciras has been Cancelled
and he is proceeding from Tangier direct
to madrid, where he will meet the head of
hisservice there and also von KARSTHOFF,
his Lisbon representative. He will have
interviews with the High Comissioner
of Spanish Morocco, Spanish linister for
Nar ASE SIO, and de Campos of the spanish
General Staff. The Spanish authorities
have been facilitating and collaborating
wholeheartedly with the German espionage
organisation in Spain particularly as re-
gards setting up of elaborate technical
devices for maintaining a 24-hour watch
on British shipping passing through the
Straits, There is further evidence to
show that they are now withholdin the
necessary permission for the organisation
to start operating. Canaris will pre-
sumably take this matter up in madrid. The
head of the German organisation at
Algeciras, formerly referred to as
BODEGAS, has now been identified as
Georg Anton KELLER, who lives at the hotel
Cristina and has an associate in the
manager, uans LEFB. He is also associated
with Alberto CARVE who lives at te hotel
and is a former electrical engineer
employed in Siemens. A Gerdan S.S. station
has been established at wa Linea. . It is
reporting the movements of British aircraft
flying from Gib. A German agent in Lisbon
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

516
About 4 weeks ao the Germans interrogated
in Lisbon a Pole name Jan LIETUS who had
arrived from England. Following interro-
gation he was to be despatched to Berlin by
plane. This man Landed in U.K. in July
1940 after his ship had been sunk and
apparently remained here unintemiptedly
until Feb. 1942 when he signed on the
s.s. Marocz for a one-way trip to Lisbon.
On arrival there he appears to have gone
to the Germans and siven them all the
information of value that he had been
able to obtain during 13 months. in this
country. He is also stated to have sold
the Germans his English ration-book. ile
asked no reward except permission to
return to his wife in Danzig.
The Germans are showing a renewed interest
in the question of carrying passengers
on ships plying between Lisbon and Eire
ports. The question of sending money to
Lire by this route is being considered.
A Swiss Yacht dalled the Mutli belonging
to a Swiss national Johannes Oskar
von MEISSTEIFFEN which recently put in
to Bathurst, Gambia, has been identified
with an enterprise referred to in special
sources. The yacht was formerly called
the Trold II and was active on behalf of
the German S.S. at we havre during the
autumn of 1940. MEISTEIFFEK who
knows England well and has connections
here was recruited by the Germans S.S.
Station at Cologne and apparently handed
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

517
He is thinking of trying to get the traffic
between w. America and v. Africa concentrated
at Trinidad since Bathurst offers no real
facilities.
Another spy with a transmitter has been
caught in Iceland, T.A.R. is now on his
way and should be here on Monday or tuesday
Stopford has got to Scapa and the in a
C. is making the necessary arrangements
for him to go toIceland from the Clyde
after he has interviewed the prisoners and
decided which ones he wishes to take with
him.
Lennox tells me that on information
obtained from the Tirpitz has been
pin-pointed in some Norwegian fjord
and is to be bombed tonight. I gather
that we are carrying out one or two
reconnaissance raias in Libya and that
towards the end of hiay we contemplate
making an attack. Auchinleck's cover
paan is to put ENSA in the front line
and send all the senior officers on leay
giving the matter as much publicity
as possible. Whether this really is
strategic deception or merely an excuse
for getting rid of senior officers and
leaving matters in charge of younger men
is not clear.
the D.G. has written to u suggesting that
without prejudice to the final decision
V.V. and I, with vick and Felix should
discuss the feasibility of amalgamation.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

519
inclined to agree to his coming and
I will have him watched for a period
and then pull him in. He has a close
friend here calls ans JAEGER concerning
whom we are doubtful.
april 20th
There is an ISOS reference to CALVO
which makes it quite clear that he
is on the German books as one of their
agents.
CD
There has been another leakage case of
a man called Anthony Friere MARRECO,
of the Fleet Air Arm who has been talking
very indiscreetly, in a pub in Chelsea.
One of M's people put down his statements
which have been verified and found to be
correct. The man will be brought down
for interrogation and possibly court-
martialled.
An interesting case is that of ur, Paul
BORCHARDT, a German Jew of Catholic faith.
He is an explorer and an authority on th
the geography of the Libyan desert
and during the last war he worked in the
Middle East as a German agent under the
name of Abdul Hamil BATOOTA. In 1932
he was director of the German Military
Geographical School but in the following
year he was discharged owing to his Jewish
blood. As an ex-officer he received
military protection and was allowed to go
on teaching unofficially, until Nov. 1938
when he was arrested and interned. In
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

521
his protested hatred of Nazism was genuine
but in time of war his loyalty to Germany
and to his military caste became paramount.
I am going to take steps to get this story
brought to the notice of the Advisory
Committee in the Home Office ad other
interested departments.
April 27th
Victor tells me that the police are work-
ing up a case against KRITZ. C have
been miking the office with quite interes-
ting results, but the nuestion is how to
communicate this information to the
police without disclosing our sources.
Viv. rang me to say that the P.M. was
interested in the SIKORSKI incident and w
wanted a report. I hive asked Victor
to supply this.
Jock Why te came to see me this morning.
The D.G. spoke to us both and said he
wanted the slate wiped clean. I went
through the case of Castine REED with
Jock, and pointed out to him where
I thought the case had gone wrong. I also
asked him whether he would consent to
spare Vesey for other work as he did not
seem to have much to do. He admitted
that Vesey was only partially employed
at the moment but he did not think
that he could carry on without a substi-
tute for Vesey. I also mentioned to
him the case of Paul BORCHARDT. Vesey
in making his summary had said there
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189°

425
sugdenly since we only knew on Friday or
Saturday morning that T. 1. R. was to leave
on Monday. He had previously been told
he could not get a plane for 3 weeks.
Jock why te came to see me again about
the case of the Italian woman in Glasgow
who was receiving letters at a cafe which
she was handing on to seamen to take to
Lisbon. As most of the people concerne
were Italians the case was handled by
E.6. He wanted to know whether it should
remain with .6. I said that I wasstill
without the file which he had promised to
send up to me and till I had seen the
papers I did not feel in a position to
speak. As a general rule I thought it
was better that tie language section should
continue to deal with the case provided
they kept us fully informed.
I arranged for Cowgill to come over in
order to discuss the ISOS-ISK muestion.
He suggested is a solution that he should
go through our memo and that anything
that had not gone to Maunsell should be
sent out by wire. He evidently does
not think that it is either necessary
ordesirable to send us copies of what
he normally sends to the Middle East, but
this question was left in abeyance until
our meeting on Thursday. He told us
that he had been sending out a paraphrased
version of ISK messa es but it was ouite
clear that Maunsell nas not got any thing
in the nature of a general synopsis of
Catalogue Reference: KVITATGE I affecting his area.

53
THIS IS A COPY
ORIGINAL DOCUMENT RETAINED
IN DEPARTMENT UNDER SECTION
3 (4) OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS
ACT 1958. april 2000
and he thousat it much better toat a
Cabinet representative should take over.
Mrs. Casey said that Cripps's visit to
India nad nad a tremendous effect in
america. There was uite a section of
the population who are always been very
inclined to think we were rubbin, te neses
of tie Indians in the oirt an beer
doing so for hundreds oi yers. They were
now rather surorised to find that en
the Indians were offers indesentence of
á plate they were stupið enough to
trn it down. They no began to wonder
whetier they are so fittea for self-
government as they previously imagined.
I had a lonx talk with
at the
club. He gave me a picture oi that had
been happening in Ney York. Apparently
D.S.C. very nearly closed do'n fex
months ago. Certain Isolationists or
anti-British elements both in the Govern-
ment and in the Senate 620 got together
and drafted a Registration Bill waich would
nave forcen D.s... to submit all their
papers, personnel etc. to examination
by the police. This was due to
several causes. loover N-Snnoveo
because Stephenson had been dealing yiti
Donovon. Te senators were annoued because
certain friends of Sternenson's had cot
to know about the German ramifications of
American chemiculs, General Motors, Sten-
Qard Oil. etc. and Birley, an inder-
Secretary of State in the State wei., 10
taken the view tiat D.S.C. were goiné far
Catalogue Reference:RM4089 or liaisin with
the aor ropriate de is. OI 119 uovt.

5
the Navy Dept. and sug ested that Steph-
enson should be present. After listening
to Biddle and Birley who both thouent
D.S.C. should be reduced to the position
of a liaison section with the aporo-
priate govt. depts., he said that these
conditions entirely met with his approval
since that was in fact what they had been
doing since the beginning of the war.
He referred to wr. Hoover for verifica-
tion and pointed out that he had rendered
no less than 3,900 reports to the 1.B.I.
Since however the authorities had decided
to proceed with the bill he pro osed to
close down his organisation forthwith .
and to have no further relations with them.
The meeting broke up in confusion. Next
day Hoover came down tosee Stephenson.
Stephenson told loover exactly what he
thought of him. le said that he had been
a party to an intrigue for some consider-
able time and that had there been any
real objection to any of Stephenson's
activities it would have been quite simple
for Hoover to ring him up and ask him
to discuss the position. This he had
not done. Stephenson therefore did not
propose to have any further dealings with
him. Hoover then tried to get Stephenson
to agree to pass all his information
tarough the F.B.I.. Stephenson again
refused. Eventually loover went away
rather apologetically and undertook to
smooth matters out which he did. The
situation is now much better and Hoover
has told his subordinates to Co-operate
wholeheartedly with D.O.U.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

Sat
somewhere in Castletown noche in Cork
about the 10th April. There has apparently
been a hunt by the local fome Guard but so
far without success.
The D.G. has agreed to our sending expert
falconers to the Scilly Isles to see if we
can get some of the pi eons said to be
passing over the island en route from
Eire to the continent. The item is a
rather ex ensive one. It will cost about
$ 200.
April 29th
Felix haswrilten me a somennat insulting
letter in which he conolains about my
letter to nim regarding BOVRIL and other
letters that he has received from B. 1A.
He says that all these letters seem to be
based on some idea that it is our business
to control XX agents all over the world,
and makes a number of otner allegations
wain are completely unfounded.
I saw Milmo and Marriott about the
Icelandic ex edition. There is dificu
about the orders for internment. We
propose to hold them under 21A of D.R.
which was specially drafted to deal with
people brought to this country from abroad
under military or naval authority. I later
saw waxwell about this and got his agree-
ment. PALSSON, the wireless operator,
has gone to Iceland with stopford, and' MAGNO
-SSON, JONSON and DALBERG are on their
way to Camp 020. The new arrival in Ice-
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/489RIIS.

to anyone I think concerned in this office
must rost with me. As regards censorship
it was agreed to try out the plan of
Gibbs representing S.I.S. and Grogan oursel
-ves. Gibbs will remain in this derart-
ment, and will report at the end of
6 weeks whether he thinks there is a job
for 2 people. I explained to the meeting
the views of the D.G. about the C.".S.
Black List. S.I.S. will continue to
make their contribution.
The situation in Malta is getting rather
serious. The Ackack unite are reduced
to 15 rounds per gun per day. It is felt
that it will be difficult for Malta to
nold out after the 30th May unless supplies
can be got through. The situation can
only be really eased by an offensive in
Libya and the recapture of Benghazi.
S.I.S. reports show that the Germins do not
contemplate making an attack on Malta or
the Middle East, but that they will con-
centrate entirely on South nussia.
Activities in the Egean directed against
Turkey are only a blind. The Czechs say
that the Russians have not detected any
large German concentrations behind the
lines.
Lennox and Cueens came to see me about the
Evening News leakage case. It was decided
to take no further action but to institute
special measires for the next operation.
I have sent off my reply to Felix.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

534
should be two depts. both investigating
the activities of the Abwehr. v. also
talked about transmitters that had gone
bad. He seemed to think that tiarmer nad
made a mess of the VICTOIRE transmitter.
I told him that he had nothing on us with
regard to this matter. We had taken over
the transmitter at a meeting where he
and S.O. E. were represented and at the
request of both parties. Subsequently
every word of the traffic har been
submitted to the Service Depts., to Dun-
derdale and to Section V. If any thing had
been put forward which did not meet with
his approvi1 he had only his own dept.
to blame. He accepted this but said
that he thought his dept. shoulo- really
run the transmitter. I said I did not
think it mattered in the least, provided
he submitted all his messages to all the
interested parties including ourselves,
before they were sent. My reason was that
we had a network which practiced decep-
tion as well as counter-espionage. It
terefore necessary that deception should
be made in one common pool. He seemed to
agree with this view.
Blunt tells me that he has heard through
Orange that SULZER was approached by
SCHACHT before he came to this country
regarding peace proposals, but that he
refused to make any soundin's.
Frost came to talk to me about an S.O.E.
project to blow up repeater stations in
France. Frost seemed to think that we
should give thisuidda our blessing, since
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

533
THIS IS A COPY .
ORIGINAL DOCUMENT RETAINED
N DEPARTMENT UNDER SECTION
3(4) OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS
ACT 1958. april 2000
that he had had a letter from a friend in
the army who was employed in some ofíice
where he had access to plins about an
attack on Frince. I told jock to iino on
the atmosphere in wich the conversation
nad taken place. Tas COOK conspiritirial
about it or is no just makinest itement.
of fact?
A party of Germans arrived on the m. v
Luna, which beached on tire worthumberlina
coast on the niant of day 2nd. The
party consisted of 4 Germans and a Brazilia
of German origin. One of tne Germans
claims to be a deserter from the verman
Army and the remainder purport to be
civilian escapees. As the date of their
departure from Berzern coincide with
an undertaking organised by ibt. il from
Bergen the party was sent to Camo u20.
achell told me about a woman called
CALLACHAN who 1-0 leakea to a friend of
his about, translacion work sine as go
on material.
The D.G. has agreen to A.1. SEATSON
and larvey being taken on in ö.in..
MacIver cume to talk to me abot RSLOs ana
commanos. lip 2 Corios were annarently
not in favour of gettin. commands to sec na
officers to the risos for training. This
seems to me a nity as I i-l syro trat..
some of the old 10-ies that ie aru sending
down will be nuits yooless in time of
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

535
was on his way. We now learned from the
man himself that he had been sent here
because he went to the S.I.S. represen-
tative in Lisbon, threw his papers on the
table and said that he was going back to
Spain, where nobody would find him.
He was fed up with the whole business.
Whatever was the outcome of this case,
I said that I did not understand how
Telix was able to come and tell me that
he did not get the conditions he wanted
he could not agree to the agent coming to
this country, even though he knew that
if he remained in Lisbon he would certain-
ly be blown. Viv. is obviously
unconscious of the many irritations taat we
we have had to put up with for months.
He is not sufficiently acquainted with the
work of Section V. to know the real facts.
He thinks that Felix is moved only by a
a sense of patriotism and a desire to get
on with the war. He believes that he is
quite ingenuous whereas we have now been
driven to regard him as tricky.
Gibbs explained to me today that the
suppression of the wahti Air Service had
resulted in the Americans runnin, a line
from Natal, Brazil, to Monrovia, thence to
Portuguese E.Africa and thence to wisbon.
Mails coming from America to join this
service to Natal were censored at Trini-
dad but the mails from. America were
uncensored. The americans were able to car
carry 4 times the mount or the wanti
planes. The Germans are apparently
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

537
cations take about 9-15 days and deal with
affairs in the USA, Middle East and U.K.,
it seems not unlikely that the collecting
point is the junction of the air lines in
Monrevia.
May 6th
I attended a meeting at Kinnaird House
on the subject of Censorship in Africa.
The Portuguese have been complaining
that they are being forced to violate
their neutrality by bringing their ships
into Table Bay for censorship. It is
proposed to tell them that we agree to
mail bags going by land routes via S. Africa
territory instead of calling in at Table
Bay but that we intend to be tough in
pulling in any Portuguese ship on account
of illicit mail traffic. Some of these
ships which are not carrying regular
mails, carry as many as 5,000 letters
unoificially. This practice has apparently
been going on for years. The people
we really want to get at are the couriers
who are given secret messages.
M. is apparently having trouble with van
der Willik and Acqworth. He wants to get
rid of them both and take over IDA.
I saw ut. Little who is working in close
touch with Stratton and Strachey in Canada.
He told me that so far their jap researches
had brought no results.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

2349
send as much help as they could from Syria,
Palestine and Iraq to Wavell.
May 8th
ISOS shows that Tricycle is mistrusted.
It may be tiat itis is only due to the
fact that the Brazil station of the Ab-
wehr has been raided. The Germans may
think that Tricycle has thereby been
compromised since he was formerly in
Brazil.
Foley is now to deal almost exclusive y
with XX agents and will be a member of
the Twenty Committ-e. Inis should ease
toe position as beteen Felix and D.14.
Stopford has sent a rather agitated tele-
gram from Iceland. It appears that Wise,
the D.S.O., wito the assistance of a couple
of Americans, has rough-handled the crew
of the "Arctic". G.O.C. has sent Wise home
with a recommendation that he should be
tried by Court Martial.
Blackford rang me up to say thit, he was
worried about what arreared to him to
indicate a number 01 akases trough
American channels. He was reierring to
suecial material. I said tot i ne would
give me the numbers of the messages I would
Eet fiart to give him an opinion.
Morton is tryin to find a way out of the
chaloge resterendee:Kvartegnts us to tell

541
they were Russian telegrams sent from
Shanghai. It was not thogght that they
were German. After this rebuff Gill,T-R
and others in R.S.S. decided to try their
hand at breaking the messages and eventually
succeeded. They were of course German,
and part of the ISOS network. It was from
Snow's messages that the form of ISOS
was learned and effortswere then made to
pick up others of a similar kind. ..
Gradually the network devel ped until
it covered an area from Krikness to Ankara,
and later on North and South America.
Rudolf Garvin KELLAR and Herman Peter
STAHLDER of the Swedish freighter St.Cyr
are being prosecuted in the USA for
espionage. They were in possession of a
map of Gib. showing uñilities and other
places of importance and also photographs
of Gib. taken from the sea. They had been
recruited in Genoa by OVRA. The fact that
water supplies featured prominently on
the map may perhaps be si-nificant since if
Gib. were attacked water would be the
main objective.
S.I.S. have now applied for leave to
establish one of their officers in Trini-
dad. They wish to use it as a base for
penetration of Venezuela and they think
it will also be important from the Censors
-ship angle, ifHerbert is successful in get-
ting the S. American mails dealt with there.
Herbert has writtento me about his
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

428
event of invasion were also discussed.
It was agreed that factories should be
told to refer direct to the police in
invasion instead of through the D.Branches
with whom it might be extremely difficult
to communicate. B. IC are to arrange for
their own transport if possible by ear-
marking cars which would be placed at
their disposal by the members of the office
who in view of the forthcoming cancell-
ation of petrol rations would otherwise
be laying them up.
Owing to the lengthy meeting Curry was
not able to give his lecture on the
Abwehr.
I lunched with Lennox. He confided to
me his scheme for setting up an Intelli-
gence organisation under the War Cabinet
or the Chiefs of Staff which would be
the recipient of all vital operational
information and of all data regarding our
future plans, whether sit.S.,.0 E.,
C.C.O., Army, Navy or air force. His
contention is that experience has shown a
that vital information often does not
reach the proper quarter in time. I told
him that I forsaw a good many difficulties
since it would be difficult to say what
information was of operational importance.
If he was going to have all information,
it would mean setting up an'enormous
organisation. He told me that he had
given a copy of his note to the D.G.
He then suggested that his duties which
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

543
the latter gave himself up in N. Ireland.
MCGINNIS who has a boat at Cork with a
wireless set has been in touch with
MASGEIK, the Manager of the steel works,
an ex-Siemens man. Both MCGINNIS and
MASGEIK have been arrested. This
rmation comes from S.I.- sources
and needs confirmation.
The Land Spider RIIS established
contact with the Germans on 5th May and
has exchanged traffic daily since that
date. His control station is in Hamburg
but difficulty is being experienced in
intercepting replies owing to fact that
the frequency used is difficult to pick
up in this country.
Cussen came to see me about an anonymous
letter picked up in the Admiralty which
implied that a man named OSWALD and two
others in the War Registry were selling
information. It seems probable that this
letter naas been writ en out of spite
and carefully planted. We are going to
try and identify the handwriting. We al
are also keeping OSWALD under observation
and placing someone in the registry to
get the general atmosphere, which as far
as we can learn is not good.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

ба
twice to the German Embassy about some
form of employment. It seemed to me from
thefiles that the identity of the woman
who telephoned with that of the woman who
had been originally ad' roached had not been
satisfactorily established. I suggested
various ways of doing this.
T. A. R. has arrived back at last. le had
to put in at Freetown owing to engine
trouble and took about from there, which
was bringing back a lot of refugees from
Singapore. He said that from tle accounts
he had heard, the behaviour of the
Australians in Singapore was deplorable.
They had done very little figating, nad
got hopelessly drunk and had literally
fought their way on to the ships that were
leaving. It was alleged that in order to
get on board they had even shot women an
children. He seems to have been very
impressed with Maunsell and the organisatio
which he has set up. Co-operation there
is first-class. He has in his office
representatives of both S.I.S. and S.O.E.
and all work in perfect harmony. Mauns
is running agents in Turkey who are
working alongside those of S.I.S. ile told
me that the telegram about running agents
abroad which we received arose through
the fact that at an informal meeting he
had referred to a remark which he under-
stood had been made at the meeting by C.
to the effect that XX agents who hd pone
wrong would be brought into a common 9001.
The wnole matter caused no excitement
locally but something in the nature of an
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189
wrong welfact that xx, the meeting by

THIS IS A COPY
ORIGINAL DOCUMENT RETAINED
IN DEPARTMENT UNDER SECTION
3 (4) OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS
TACT 1958. Oct 2000
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

THIS IS A COPY
ORIGINAL DOCUMENT RETAINED
IN DEPARTMENT UNDER SECTION
3 (4) OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS
ACT 1958.Oct dood
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

$49
May 12th
D. G. meeting. I raised the question of
both external and internal communications.
It was important for us when we sent off a
letter to know exactly what route it was
to take to one of our D. S. Os abroad. As
recards internal communication I mentioned
the extensive losses of Post Office ba-s
which had been previously reported by
G.P.O. as being something in the neighbour-
hood of 6-7,000 per annum as against 600
in pre-war times..
Theo spoke about the unsatisfactory
position of troops coming from abroad
to join Allied Forces. It is now. pro-
posed that those coming from non-British
territories should go to the R.P.S.
except those from the U.S.A. who were
supposed to be vetted locally and given
a white card. The white card system is
not working well. Many of the troops
turn up without cards and will have to be
let in on the recommendation of their
C.O.
Harry Allan spoke on various measures to
tighten up security in the Isle of "ight.
There is to be an elaborate system of
passes and access to the main land is to
be limited to absolute necessities. C.C.O
apparently does not mind the fact being
known that there are forces there provided
no details leak out as to the time of
attack and the objective.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

65)
Frost talked to me about the met.case of
ITTURALDE. apparently there has been some
difficulty with the mike. Signals can be
heard locally quite well but there is
nobody there to understand tie language.
There have been further met. reports from
G.C. C.S. which indicate that at any
rate 3 weeks ago reports were coming from
the area previously noted.
I spoke to Frost about wireless sets on
ships. He said the position was not at
2. I satisfactory since they often remained
in port without bein sealed up, owin to
complaints írom our allies tut the men
on board coulà not get entertainment.
C's reply to the D.g.s note on amal, mation
of Section V. has arrived. There seem
to be a lot of fallacies in te argument in
a number of aspects of the problem drawn
in which do not strike one as being
particularly relevant. The document
amounts to a flat "No". It is proposed
that we should send some reply and that
the papers should then be submitted to
Lord Swinton. Our suggestion for seconding
a section to S.I.S. is considered illogi-
cal on the grounds that we should be
giving orders to peorle who were not
actually under our control. The answer is
I think that our orders would always be
subject to veto if they were likely to
prejudice C's interests abroad. We however
would prefer to frame our uestions Our-
selves. It is felt that our demands would
have been much more logical if we had

553
May 13th
Jim Hale has prepared a long note on
KOLINSKI. He thinks that the evidence
against him is very thin and that the case
avainst GORANSEN has not been properly
investigated. SIMON'S note contains a
definite statement that GORANSEN agreed
to work. GORANSEN denies that he ever
knew SIMON or that he agreed to work for
anybody. This denial does not sound very
convincing. No further enquiries appear
to have been made about GORA, SEN. I have
passed the note to Jock Why te for his
comments.
Stephenson has sent a wire saying that he
is glad that I have at last acce ted his
long-standing invitation.
May 14th
Cussen discussed with me the case of Mrs.
CALLACHAN which is complicated by the fact
that she is going to have a baby. She is
to be interrogated and reprimanded. Her
services will be retained until she has
her baby. She will not be asked to return.
We had a conference with relix, wedlam, uick,
wakin and Senter, about the activities of
allied agents in uib. It was agreed that
there was not much value in Medlam's censor-
ing telegrams and communications for these
people if he did not know more about the
cases. It was agreed that Felix should
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

S55
certain prisoners who had been taken off
the "Arctic". There was no doubt that he
had been faced with an extremely difficult
problem and that it was vital to ascertain
wnich members of the crew were in fact
German agents, and to get the full story.
This he succeeded in doing. On his return
here he has married Curry's secretary.
I visited C.C.Os office with the D.G.
and Lennox. The C.C.O. had apparently
been rather worried about the Isle of
Wight which he thought was seething with
spies. D.G. gave him a general survey
of the situation which seemed to satisfy
him.
urry had a meeting with Viv. and had
intended to express his views on the ques-
tion of amalgamation, but does not seem
to have been able to get a word in edge-
ways. Viv. held forth at great length for
about an hour and just as Curry was hoping
to get in his stuff the telephone rang and
Viv. was sent for by C.S.S. Curry's main
point was that neither ourselves ncr S.I.S,
in fact nobody, was really responsible
for giving a comprehensive view of the
German espionige system.
TheGerman organisation in Lisbon is sending
to this country within the next few weeks
an agent who is to work as a mechanic in
an aircraft factory here and is to communi-
cate by secret ink letters. He will
arrive here by aeroplane. lle is an agent
of the Naval section of the German S.S. in
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

587
Unreliable information said come from
an agent in England is being passed by
Madrid to Berlin. It appears to come from
ALCAZAR's organisation. Six of such agents
are known to us by designation though not
by name and only one of them to our know-
ledge has passed information which could
be considered as even remotely true.
The German S.S. in Spain have been asked
by Berlin to suruly a cover address in
Spain to which a Dutch seaman shortly to
leave for Engl nd may write. We do not
know his n me or cover address, but he
MIL sign his letters, which will be
written in Dutch or english, with the name
of Karel van DONGEN. It is not known
wet ler he will come as a seaman from t e
Peninsula or as an escapee from Holland.
Nantes is now to become of increasing
importance for vork against this country
or British organisations in France.
May 15th
I had lunch with the D.G. who is going on
10 days leave today. He is going to leave
the reply to C's letter about amalgamation
until his return.
Sneath has seen -eonard Ingrims about "ITT.
Sneath is doubtful about "ITT but we both
thought that he might possibly be made
some use of if he was allowed to follow
his own line of putting out on a special
transmitter propaganda which would cause
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

now be ruthlessly stopped. I said that I
thought it might be more profitable to keep
the channel open and examine the contents
of the letters. Grogan vill put this
view to the committee.
Lt.Park of S.O.E. came to see me about
the case of the Frenchman GOURAND @ LEE
who married Miss Davis of the 11.0. LEE
is said to have been very indiscreet.
although as an S.O.E. officer he has done
extremely valuable and dangerous work.
The trouble is that by his indiscretions
he is likely to sive away his comrades.
I had already drawn S.O.E.s attention
to other indiscretions which had come to
my notice from entirely independent sources
I suggested that rather than court martial
him they should interrogate him very
severely and imoress upon him that it was
not only his life at stake but many
of his colleagues. They should then
place him on his honour to state the names
of all those to whom he had talked. These
people should then be interviewed and told
to keep their mouths shut. Park thinks
this might be the best way out of the
difficulty. He will let us know if he
wants our assistance.
Sneath tells me that some very clear sounds
of tanping have been heard wing on in
WITT's room. It is suspected that he
may be tam cring with his nev wireless
receiving set which we have given him.
It is of a kind which can be easily con-
Catalogue Reference KO7&189xious to test him out.
vorted and

430
putting him in touch with MATSUMOTO at the
Oratory Schools and miking the conversa-
tion. The position is more difficult than
I thought since Donald does not apparently
know MATSUMOTO and it would therefore
be difficult to find a plausible excuse
for bringing them together. Courtney Young
is going o try and think out some better
scheme.
OL
I saw the D. G. about his memo. I told
him that I thought it would be a good thing
to hold it up until Dick and I had had
an opportunity of visiting G. C & C.S.
and learned more about the distribution
of ZPT material, and the study of it.
I also said that I thought that tuere were
two separate subjects which had perhaps
become slightly confused. One was the
study of the German intelligence system,
the other was the quick distribution of
operational information to the departments
concerned by some body which really knew
what operations were taking place. I
also said that if we did not get our
facts correct the whole scheme would be
likely to fall down in consequence. None
of the Intelligence Depts. would view it
with a favourable eye. They would not say:
"Here is a good idea. Let us see how we
can make it work", but rather "What red
herring can we draw across the trail in
order to torpedo it". It was therefore
necessary to move cautiously.
I had a long talk with -urt about uib.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

561
intimated that he was too clever for the
British, that they would never get him as
he would take poison. Ile was also heard to
remark "den Sneath werde ich verkillen".
Next morning he rang up our informant
in a great state and wanted to know what
he had said the niunt before. Had he
talked about his past. He was reassured
by the informant saying that he was so
tight himself that he really did not know
what had been said. He did however think
that there had been some mention of
WITT meetins NEY DRICH. WITT immediately
said he had never met IEY DRICH but ne
did once meet a man who came from IEYDRICH.
The informant then said that in any case
it was of no consequence.
Dick had a long convengation with Viv.
about Felix and amalgamation. Viv.
contests hotly that felix is not tricky
but merely secretive as he does not with
to let down his own side. I think there
may be comething in this but at tie same
time it would make for far better co-opera.
tion if Felix told us nuits frankly what
his difficulties were de could cuite
well do this without being disloyal, and
he would find us sympathetic listeners.
Viv. hd no answer to the uestion as to
what dept. was supposed to take a comprehen-
sive view of the Abwehr. vick told him
that there would be a comeback to C's
letter after the D.G. returns.
Lakin has asked me to look into the security
of the $.0.E. office in New York.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

563
with German espionage work in Portugal
at least since 1937 is now in disfavour
with the German authorities. Recently
there has been a suggestion that he was
preparing to break away altogether from
his German associates and attempt to seek r
refuge in this country. Subsequent to
this information it has come to notice
that the head of the German S.S. in Portu-
gal is making attempts to have RUSER
called up for military service although
his age group has not yet been reached.
There are now fairly clear indications
that zbV. 800 is in actual fact a part of
the Abwehr organ sation. Its members
are xxx&xtaxka known to be used both for
sabotage and espionage work, and the most
recent information suggests that it might
also be a sort of pool for trained agents
upon which various branches of the Abwehr
may draw for personnel.
Canaris ended his visit to Spain on 25.4.42
when he travelled from Madrid to Paris.
T.A. R. and I saw A. H. Robertson in connec-
tion with the trouble that arose about him
and his wife in Lisbon. He has given a
very frank statement, which as far as I can
see entirely absolves both of them of any
serdus charge. The most that can be said
is that they were rather indiscreet in
their personal relations which led to a
good deal of undesirable gossip.
Catalogue Reference KVIX/189 ay D.D.4. said that

He fell for this quite easily and told
them that drink was one of the main
troubles, and that OSWALD and others
(whom he had mentioned in his letter)
were the principal offenders. He was
then shown the letter but denied at first
that he had written it. Burt took the
line that he had doubtless done it from
patriotic motives but perhaps it mient have
been betterif he had approached his senior
officer. Doran eventually admitted that
he had written the letter and also another
one which had been sent in anonymously.
My view is that the case should go to the
D.P.P. In the meantime we have almost
completed arrangements for putting someone
into the arhegistry with the concurrence
of its head. Now that the culprit has
been identified I do not think that we
can concern ourselves further since we
should be laying ourselves open to the
accusation that we ere employing Gestapo
methods on the Civil Service, Turther
the headof the registry could only conclude
that our informant was coming in to
criticise his mnagement. He would there-
fore be certain to spike the informant's
guns. Cussen is going to put this view
to the ADNI who is very keen that we should
continue our enquiries.
I attended a meeting at the yF.O. with
Cadogan in the chair. C. ,Viv., Scott,
R berts and Jim Hale were also resent.
It was extremely satisfactory in that the
principle on which exchange of prisoners
should be carri
in future was laid
loque Reference:
down.
that exchange should
VIS
LU
Teca

** THIS IS A COPY567
ORIGINAL DOCUMENT RETINED
IN DEPARTMENT UNDER SECTION
3(4) OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS
May 20+ACT 1958. aallood
SITT's case is developing in an interestin
way. At about 10.30 last nigit some very
curious sounds were coming from his fiat.
He had his wieless set working and we
gained the impression thit he was tring
to pick u:. morse signiis. It is ooss1019
that he may have been trying to transmit b:
this is by no means certain.
ie
propose to let him go on in the hopes
tiatwe may get to the bottom of this very
interesting case.
I attended a meeting of the Boara in
the evening. D.N.I. raised the question
of wether we could be given a iixed tir et
some vere on the continental cost to which
through our XX system we could draw the
enemy's special attention. It would have to
be a target which would not be an objective,
The advantage claimed was that we might
nending some final decision as to our
major strategic plan frighten the enemy
sufficiently to make him dra off troops
from Russia. Te goneral view of the
meetine vas tuit as there were so few
targets for a major operation it would be
difficult to make a final selection. If
we chose a target mich was obviously
unsuitable the enemy, who knos waat is .
feasible just as we do, would not be deceive
Catalogue Reference: KVA that iinclater shoula

$69
I also told Viv. tiat I was going there
with an open mind but that looking at
things from a distance it did see to me
that there were a good many unnecessary
cogs in the machine. If I thought that
it was necessary for us to have our repre-
sentative there I would tell him so quite
frankly on my return. He told me that
C. had at one moment wished to limit
the scope of my discussions with Stephen-
son. Viv. had replied that it was quite
obvious that Stephenson and I would have
to discuss every possible astect of the
work from every angle.
I talked about the amalg umation scheme
with Viv. I told him tut we ha felt
that some of C's arguments were fallacious.
I doubted whether Section V's commitments
as far as other departments were concerned
really bulked very large. I also told
him that we did not feel that Section V.
either at home or abroad could claim
any very special qualifications for te
work. Most of them were only hali-trained
and inexperienced. Dome of them intellec-
tually were not of a very hi h order.
He then said he had the impression
that we were really not satisfied with
the services of Section V. I said regretfull
that this was so. I fully realised the
difficulties of the job but it did seem to
me that in spite of what u had said in
his letter there were cert in very funda -
mental muestions which had not been answered
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

$71
he thought it did not immediately concern
us. This is how Viv. and I had always
worked together in the past and we never
had any trouble. We had always talked
well across the borderline. Viv's remedy
seemed to be to define functions even
more ri idly than they are at present.
I am sure this is hopeless.
May 22nd
We have succeeded in identifying the German
agent who is coming to work in an aircraft
factory. He is a Portuguese nimed SIMOES.
This is a good piece of work on the part
of B.B.
Glyn of S.O.E. came to see me about the
security of his office in New York. He
told me thata telegram had been sent to
Stephenson who had replied taat he would
certainly consult with me but that he
considered the position was not satisfac-
tory.
I spent a good deal of the day collecting
tickets etc.
May_23rd
I had a talk with Milmo and T. 1. R. on the
possibilities of getting a XX agent over
here who had a certain knowledge of wire-
less. In this way we thought we might be
able to get more up to date on German
wireless procedure etc. A number of
Catalogue Referente: K074/18garned through

523
It seems that the Germans have made a
very close study of the form of whaddon
operators and can recognise them very
easily. Their D.F. ing apparatus is
considered to be extremely good and
accurate. They must think that ours
is very bad in view of the fact that
Tate and co. have got away with it for
só long.
May 24th
Molotov has been in thiscountry for
three days and discussions are proceeding.
Spent the day clearing up. I am to
take the 7.15 special B.0.A.C. train
for Bristol this evening. Arrived Bristol
9.30, where we were told that there was
a 24 hour delay and that the B.0.A.C.
regretted that we should have to pay our
expenses at Bristol out of our £10.
May 25th
Lane met me in a car and I went out to his
office, where I met Fairweather, S.C.O.
Bristol. I spent most of the day with
him and his subordinates. He showed me
his office and in the afternoon I went down
to the airport to watch the examination
of the passengers coming in on the Lisbon
plane. There werea number of Polish women
who were coming to join their husbands, but
from a somewhat cursory examination they
seemed to be bona fide travellers. The
examination does
Catalogue Reference:KV/471896
10es nadogo very deep, but on

432
THIS IS A COPY
I ORIGINAL DOCUMENT RETAINED
I IN DEPARTMENT UNDER SECTION
3 (4) OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS
ACT 1958. Aprel leoo
emphasis is to some extent on Section V.
The trouble is taat they did not do any -
thing with the material when they got it,
and we wio are dependent on them for
studying counter-espionage probably do not
get the results. The examples quotea
by Felix are bad ones since most of the
delay was in the transmission of the
intercept from Bermuda fo this country.
In one case there was a delay of 3 days
owing to the fact that the D.G. insisted
on seeing the photostats. Most of the
submissions are pass on to S.1.5. within
24 hours and if they are of the slightest
importance they are telechoned immediately.
What is really at the bottom of Felix's
decision is that we have on a number of
occasions been more or less forced to
point out that submissions passed to S.L.S.
which have been intercepted between the
Americas and the Iberian Feninsula have
reposedin
tray for a matter
of weeks when they were of vital interest
to Philby who was sitting in the next room.
This leads to prodding on our part whi
is so resented by Section v. The
remedy is that they should nerform
their duties more efficiently and our
locus standi is that if they are not
efficient we suiler.
March 19th
T.A.R. has gone off and is waiting for
a call to leave for the Middle East.
Cataldgat ketefence? RV4Agging Committee. We

433
change they should realise what it involved
and consider rather carefully whether
they were going to get better service or
not. I explained that at present we passed
all material over the holorith machine
and sent it on with notes, but that if
their material did not go through this
process it would mean that they would
have to card it much more thoroughly.
There was a good illustration of the
disadvantage of not carding in the wax
MOBURG case, which concerned a German
espionage organisation in Cuba which was
in communication with Portugal. All
the submissions had been sentte Christie
and some weeks later Philby wrote a letter
asking us for information about a name
or address connected with thecase. We had
been obliged to point out to Fhilby that al
these submissions were lying in Christie's
tray , presumably uncarded. Gibbs note
seemed to indicate that Boyle might not
quite realise what he was taking on, and
that there would be an immense amount of
sifting of material to do. This rather
impressed Viv. In the end we explained
that we were not really satisfied with
Grogan in his present position and that
we thought that Gibbs could carry both our
work and S.I.S. work for more efficiently.
In our experie ce it was far better to
have the centre of activity vis a vis tne
Censorship in our office rather than at
the Prudential. I said that I would
suggest to the D.G. that Gibbs should take
over all censorship matters both for our-
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

435
a pity to let good men go who may be
drawn on 1
n for jobs abroad, which will
be required sooner or later.
Tangye tells me that the Home Secretary
has sent for the editor of the Daily
Mirror and told him that unless his paper
alters its present somewhat malicious
and defeatist tone it will be suppressed.
Fleet St. is rather on the war path and
it seems likely that there will be
trouble.
The S.O.E. representative in New York has
asked his head office for information regar
ding north and west Africa, particularly
that which refers to the enemy espionage
organisations. The request comes from
the American military authorities. Archie
Boyle has passed it on to us. I presume
that they want to collect as much informa-
tion as they can in the light of proposals
for future relations in that area.
March 2uth
D.G. spoke to me about Grogan's position
at the Cnesorship and the possibility 01
Gibbs taking over representation of both
ourseles and S.I.S. interests. He seemed
satisfied the Gibbs's arguments entirely
disposed of those put forward by Felix
in his letter to me and he also agreed
that the centre of gravity in our relations
with the Censorship should be here rather
than at the Prudential. He was not
entirely convinced that it was unnecessary
Cataldque ReferenceR/48189 and at the -rudential

the counter-espionage information wnich
goes into the common pool. S.I.S. are
merely obtaining similar information for
a similar purpose abroad. I said that it
seemed to me that there was a strong case
for saying that the direction of counter-
espionage should be under one head since
the D.G. was really responsible for
preventing enemy penetration of British
territory. It was possible however that
we might be faced with the argument
that .O.E. had conclusively proved
that it was undesirable to have two organ-
isations under different heads operating
on foreign territory and that if a third
organisation was now to be added the
confusion would be still worse. This
argument however did not necessarily apply
since there was no reason to suppose -
that division between ourselves and S.I.S.
would be any greater than the existing
division between Section V. and S.I.S.
At the moment Section V. could not function
properly as they were unable to fight their
battle against the other half of their own
office. There was moreover a duplication
of functions, and an attitude on the pa
part ofSection V. which added to the
general clogging of the wneels. I could
not see that any improvement in the
present position could be brought about
unless the D.G. took responsibility for the
work of Section V.
Dick and I went down to G.C. & C.S. We
were received by Nigel de Grey. We
explained our position vis avis ZPT and
Catalogue Referenceritangghatthe only way

43°
communications content properly integrated,
the answer was definitely No. De Grey
then went on to talk about the wauen statio
which was communicating with -ire. He was
very anxious if possible to get at certain
recyphering tables. I said that we had
considered this matter very carefully
but had comedefinitely to the conclusion
that it would be useless to attempt
this through our link with the Dire
authorities. It might even be disastrous
since there was no guarantee that somebody
in the Lire Govt. would not informed the
German authorities. Dick and I both
thought that some serious planning ought
to be done with a view to obtaining these
documents, and suggested that fields such
as S. America or Switzerland should be
explored. We are going to put this
forward to the Planning Committee, as it
is possible that in Switzerland U.35
might be able to help through his connec-
tions.
I dined with Christopherson who seemed a
very good form. They are working him Oy
pretty hard but there is no doubt that
he thoroughly enjoys the feeling of
being in the racket.
March 21st
I had a long talk with darker about/stock
of our position here. I said I thought
that there were a number of people in the
various divisions who were good workers but
Catalogue Reference KV14/1891 that there were other

441
THIS IS A COPY
ORIGINAL DOCUMENT RETAINED
IN DEPARTMENT UNDER SECTION
13 (4) OF THE PUBLIC RECORDS
ACT 1958. april 2ood
Most of the sinkings here ort the American
coast. The Germans seem to be making a
fairly dead set at tankers.
Gibbs tells me that he has made arrange-
ment for dealing with secret ink communi-
cations between BRUGADA and ALCAZAR which
are likely to be conducted through
BRIGADA will communicate in
a result of recent experiments it will
be dealt with in the following way. n
piece of damp paper is pressed on the
document containing the secret writing.
This is removed and alloved to dry. It
is then treated with a very strong re-
agent, which will bring it up for a
sufficiently long period to allow of its
being photographed. The amount of
removed is infinitisimal and cannot be
detected.
I had a long discussion with Dick todav
about our suggested amalgamation with
Section V. and we are putting up a memo.
to the D.G. recommending that this
should be proceeded vith.
Harker tells me that Horrocks is very much
in favour of it.
fothschild talked to me about his meeting
at the Swinton Comnittee on the subject of
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189 his matter has at last
been taker up. L.Branch have refused to

443
Ginetta MOSCADINI and the Central Cafe.
There have been no sensational developments
Jock Why te discussed his weekly schedule
of cases. There do not seem to be any of
special importance.
I had a talk this afternoon with Joe Archer
Bennett and Victor. Archer wants to
persuade M. A.P. that it is essential
to tighten up their gate control. He
wanted to know if we could give him any
advice or any ammunition with which to
fight the case. It was agreed that
anybody could gate-crash a factory and
that at the time of invasion something of
the kind should be expected. There will be
others inside the factory employed as
workers and there will be attacks from
without ay posses of parachutists. It is
suggested that Archer should put up a
note to the D.G. giving examples oi the
lack of security and that the D.G. should
write a letter to Lord Swinton pointing
out the facts and saying that it was usi-
less to put up fences all round a factor
if people could walk in quite easily
through the front gate.
One of the Registry girls has produced the
following parody. The Walrus and the Car-
penter represent Horrocks and Potter
respectively.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

#11
I lunched with Nevile Bland and went into
the question oí vetting. I explained to
him the whole procedure and how the
mistake had arisen regarding Nancy Farish.
He told me that she had tried for a job
with S.I.S. nd had been turned down. I
said that I thought S.I.S. must have
applied to the F.0. about her since no
application had been made here.
While I was at lunch I saw courtney Young
sitting with a Japanese half-caste whom
I suspected to be Donald. It tr inspired
afterwards thet Donald had made two
rather startling statements. First of all
he ad referred to the Stop List at the
Censorship and drawn attention to an
Any Name address near Tadworth. He said
that a girl in the Censorship iad brought
this to his notice since the address
was somewhere near his own. Courtney
Young expressed no interest. This is of
course the address to which we hope
YAMAMOTO will send his reply. A little
later in the conversation Donald started
to talk about the addresse of a man
named YAMAMOTO in Switzerland, and dren
attention to the fact that these names
always got wrongly spelt. This all seemed
extremely odd and tends to confirm our
view that Donald is the culprit. The
probability is that he was throwing a
fly over Courtney who did not rise.
We shall now have to see that the lady
in Censorship does not go running to
Donald if the letter comes from YAMAMOTO.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

Then four new maidens hurried yp,
With eagerness quite puce.
Their brains were fresh, their typing neat,
Their shorthand swift and spruce.
And this was odd, because, you see,
It wasn't any use.
Four other maidens followed them
And yet another four.
And thick and fast they came at last,
And more, and more, and more.
All trippling up the Palace steps
and scrambling through the door.
The Walrus and the Carpenter
Went on from scheme to scheme.
Re-organised the hegistry
With strategy supreme.
And then attacked the Officers,
Which no one thought extreme.
"The time has come" the Walrus said,
"To talk of many things,
Of how to choose our new Grade Twos
and should Grade One have wings.
Connectors must have scooters, and
Dispatch be put on springs."
"But wait a bit" the maidens cried,
"Before we have our chat,
Let's talk of pay, elevenses,
Days off, and things like that".
"Work harder" said the Carpenter,
"You're getting much too fat."
'If you're excused, "the Walrus mused,
"From work at half past five,
Cataldoue reperenceR074/488 blackout, you'll

us
There is rather a serious row going on
between De Gaulle and Muselier. It seems
to have arisen out of the St. Pierre and
Miquelon affair. Muselier and 19 of his
officers are said to have resigned. Moret,
his Chief of Staff, is among them.
Our convoy to Malta appears to have
got through after fighting two actions
with the Italian Fleet. An Italian
battleship is said to have been hit. One
ship of the convoy was sunk.
March 24th
I attended the D.G.S meeting. Theo raised
the question of aliens being enrolled
compulsorily for fire-watching. this
woud means that they would be excused
curfew and would in fact mean the abolition
of the curfew altogether. Nobody seems
to think that the curfew matters very
much, but the employment of aliens or
enemy aliens on fire-watching duty seemed t
be a serious matter, since while certain
of them might very well be employed,
there would be others who would be
extremely undesirable. In order that they
should be weeded out there would have to
be some form of vetting, which quite
clearly we could not undert ke. the
matter is gong upto the Executive.
It was decided to form a pool of officers
who would be willing to take on colonial
jobs. The idea is that they should all
become acquainted with the work of B.divisi
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

Frost talked to me about his met. reports.
He says that the met. people at the Air
Ministry have now eliminated every possi-
bility of these reports coming from our
own sources. They have even narrowed
certain of them down to an area on the
North Downs.
We have heard today that T. A. R. is leaving
Lagos for Egypt.
A man called Anthony DEERY, an ex-I.R.A.
Post Office official, has been arrested
in Dublin. Hewas found to be operating
a wireless set. The military who took over
the set managed to get through to Germany
and received a message but have not been
able to decypher it. n copy has been sent
to us and also descriptive notes about the
wireless set which seemed to have been a
rather amateur yariety.
A P/W report shows that our naval messages
are intercepted by the Beobachtungsdienst
in Berlin. These are decyphered and put
out to the units of the Fleet within ha
an honr.
Lennox tells me that there are only about
200,000 Japs available for an attack on
India.
My report on Jock Why te has gone to the D.G
I have recommended that he should be
removed from D. Division.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

4149
At the R.S.S. meeting today Morton-Evans
produced an interesting chart of the
Italian network which has been worked out
in some detail. It needs however the
necessary units to intercept it and the
cryptographers to deal with it. We
passed a resolution urging that the positio:
should be explored as soon as possible.
It seems likely that some of the circuits
are already being picked up by the
Naval, Army or Air units in the Middle East.
It is even possible that they have been
broken up.
G.C.&.C.S. are giving us the Algeciras-
Madrid traffic wnich should be an extremely
valuable service. It may provide us with
the answer to the wib. leakages.
Ms. HART No. Creedy, probaisles
Herbert came to see the D.G. today and I
was present at the meeting. I explained our
difficulties, as joint representatives
of both our interests and those of S.I.S.
As I saw the Censorship problem it was this.
Firstly it was necessary to make a careful
analysis of what mails it was possible
for us to get hold of. We could then
indicate the ones to which we attached the
most importance, and arrangements could be
made to concentrate on them each in turn
100% for a given period. I was sure that
it was only in this way that we could get
results, even though nothing in the way of
Duff or secret writing had come out of our
100%censorship of Iberian mails. Secondly
we should supply the censorship with as
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

451
I attended a meeting at Kinnaird House whic
had been called at the request of the
Admiralty. Much time was wasted in
explaining to Neville the difference betwee
a Dominion and a colony. He seemed to
think that the British Govt. could impose
upon Gen. Smuts port control officers and
F.S.P. to take over places like Durban and
Cape Town. A tentative suggestion had
already been made to Gen. Smuts that he
might care to have the services of advisers
in these matters but this had been politely
turned down at any rate for the time being,
To get up now and suggest that we should
send officers and F.S.P. seemed quite
fantastic. Neville did not seem to have
considered exactly what povers these
officers would take or how well they were
likely to be received by the Afrikaans offi
officials in the Union. Swinton compromised
by recommending that we should add an
expert on port matters to Websster's staff
so that Webster himself would be freer
to deal with other affairs.
An American Naval Oificer has been
arrested at Portsmouth for taking photo-
graphs of RDF apparatus. His house was
searched and a number of other films were
found including various names and addresses
He is at the moment a naval prisoner and
will probably have to be handed over to
the Americans. This will mean that they
will take possession or the documents. I
have got into touch with Michael Ryde
and asked him to attend the Court of
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

US3
all we none of us really knew any thing
about Bovril except in a negative way.
Jarvis had not seen him, and we only had
the story of the American Naval Attache,
the questionnaire and what was alleged
to be the traffic. Bovril had been
posing for months as a head agent in
England with 3 sub-agents. It might be
that he would be better placed here than
in Lisbon. Our interest was a mutual
one and I thought that whatever happened
we ought to get the man over to ingland as
soon as possible and that we should reserve
judgment until we had heard his whole story
Felix was evidently suffering from pro-
fessional jealousy. He had found this
agent through the good of fices of the
American Naval Attache and he did not wish
to give him up or to allow us to have
access to him even though in all our
interests it might be better that he should
remain here. Fundamentally his attitude
is "I do not see why I should get agents
and then have them pinched by you". he
whole thing is so narrow and petty that
it really makes me furious. I am quite
sure that we shall never get this right
until we take over Section V.
March 27th
I took the 12 o'clock meeting today. It
seems clear from ISOS that there is a
definite drive to get agents into Egypt
and the Middle East.This clearly fore-
shadows a drive on the oil wells.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

Felix to recruit staff under himself for
the purpose of running his own agents.
This is rather borne out by his interview
with me about Bovril. Our previous
experience of Felix running agents over her
has been disastrous. They are generally
put up in some hotel and finally appeal
to us for funds.
Findlater then went on to discuss the
question of direction from above. I
took the opcortunity of mentioning the
new transmitter in the Victoire case which
could be used for major deception. The
information required to feed it would have
to come from the operations brinches.
D.N.I. held that the ISSB was adequate for
the purpose of giving direction to the
Twenty Committee on matters of deception
since they knev all the plans and the
cover plans. I said that in practice we
hardly ever got any direction. Only in
one case had our agents been used for
deception in connection with the projected
attack on Norway. After some further
argument in which I explained that on one
day we had a plan and a cover plin and a
the next day the cover plan became the
plan and vice versa. This made it
extremely difficult for us to assist
since without early and consistent direc-
tion we could never arrange to get our
agents into a suitable position at the
appropriate moment. It emerged from this
discussion that i fact nobody had any
fixed plans since we were on the defensive
and waiting for the enemy's movements.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

457
him because his name was mentioned the
other day by Hans JAGER, one of the German
emigres here. JAGER suggested getting
WIT to this country, as he thought he would
have useful information. It may be that
JAGER also is a Gernan agent. He has cer-
tainly lied to Sneath about certain letters
that he wrote to WIT. He denied having
sent him any letters. We are prepared
to have WIT over as long as we get a
fairly good case for keeping him inside.
Theo is reorganising his division. He
proposes to dispense with the services
of 6 officers, and off-load a good many
of the duties of the division to other
divisions.
The D.G. has decided to write to C.
about the amalgamation with Section V.
March 29th
Philby telephoned to me today to say
that dans RUSER had told the Poles
in Lisbon that he was prepared toaccept
our offer to come to this country with
his mother provided he could have a
guarantee that he would not be interned
and would be allowed later to oto Americi.
Although RUSER is probably a time server
of the worst variety I think it may pay
us to get him over. I think, however he
must satisfy us as to his bona fides and
that any guaranlee as to his liberty will
be on the assumption that we are satisfied
that he is working 100% for us.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

459
entirely paralysed on one side. He is
bed-ridden and his only interest in life
is his work.
I saw Jock Why te this morning. He told me
about the case of a man n med HEAVINGSTONE
@ van HEULE. For some rather obscure
reason he thinks this man may be identical
with the famous WILKINSON mentioned by
Vera. He bases himself mainly on the
description. Van EULE's case is
certainly a curious one and may prove
interesting.
I discussed with Dick the case of Bovril
and we both agreed that we ought to make
a stand on the question of running XX
agents in this country and also on the
unreasonable attitude taken up by Felix
in this particular case.
I have again asked Ferguson to try and
fix up a date with Felix for the discussion
of the LITTLE case.
March 31st
I attended t e D.G.s meeting. Nothing
of importance was discussed, except the
proposed Foynes-New York service. It
was agreed th t we would press for Loch
Earn as a terminus in order to get over
the many censorship difficulties.
I saw Michael nyde in the afternoon when
he gave me his impression of the case of
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

working both for the Treasury and S.O.E.
He was evidently rather horrified by what
he had found. He said that on the 35th
floor of the Rockefeller Building there
were a large number oi people draving
$800 a month for doing absolutely nothing.
He liked Stephenson personally and thought
possibly in cert in lines ne naa done a
gooä job of work. On tne other n und
he thought many of his duties should now
be handed over to the Americin author-
ities. Stephenson's liaison with Donovan
was good ana it was bad with the FBI and
State Dept. There had been a very unfor-
tunate incident with the latter. One of
Stephenson's men had spoken in a derository
manner of Burley of the State Dept., and
had expressed this views unconsciously
to an agent of the F.B.I. the latter
arranged for him to repeat the conversation
on the telephone and had a record taken
of it. This was then passed to Burley
and the balloon went up,
Evelyn thinks that S.O. E. in 5. America
should cease and that all work of that
kind should be in the hands of the
Americans. If we coulā help them in
any way so much the better. The only
matter of real importance from our point of
view is that Stephenson's relations with
the F.B.I. did not appear to be very good.
II therefore we contemplated setting up
in the U.S. A it would probably be better
to do so under our own steam.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

419
I saw the D.G. later. He has I think
quite made up his mind about tackling
the problem. He is seriously concerned
about the attitude of Felix.
I discussed with the D.G. Frost's position
vis-a-vis R.S.S. I told him that as
things were at present R.S S. seemed to
question our right to enquire what units.
of R.S.S. were directed towards a solu-
tion of our problem, namely the detection
of illicit wireless in this country.
The D.G. seemed to think that we ougnt to
get our own wireless expert, but this
again presents difficulties. I suggested
to the D.G. that first of all we should
have it definitely established what our
locus standi was vis a vis R.S.S. He
promised to take this up on the refusal
of R.S.S. to tell us about the units
they were employing on a general search.
I discussed with D.G. the uestion of
representation o. B. Division in S. Africa.
Dick and T. A. R. and I were all agreed
that in the circumstances Luke would be
the best man to send since his wife is
a friend of Smuts and he knows S.Africa
well. He has also gained considerably
in experience and has been working quite
well. He will of course be nominally
under Webster.
It has been decided that Victoire should
stay here nd Lucas should go back under
an assumed name.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

4163
or Vivs. He thinks that in two departments
so closely inter-locked as our own, there
should be less rather than more formalities
in our relations.
I saw Major Aeswick of S.O.E. about the
LUCAS case. He is not unnaturally
extremely reluctant to spread the surface
of this case further than is also lutely
necessary, since LUCAS is obviously
in great danger and the same applies to
the whole of his organisation. I said that
I would do what I could to keep his name
out and to prevent the circulation of the
traffic. I discussed this matter afterward:
with warriot and J.C. who will explain the
position to the Twenty Committee tomorrow.
It was rather reassuring to find that SOE
are so concerned about the future of their
agents. One point in the wnole case wnich
puzzled Aeswick was the fact that LUCAS
having discovered that VICTOIRE had
betrayed him sho ld have been at her throat,
but in actual fact within a very short time
he seemed to be her slave. This could not
be explained by the evidence of the mike
which seemed to show that although
Victoire was very much in love with him,
he was not nearly. so enamoured with her.
I went on afterwards to see Codrington about
leakages. I explained to him, that it was
important for us to know when leakages
took place in any of our Embassies a road,
particularly marieNXXK if the stolen
matter related to this country. It might
Catalogue Reference:KV74/189 might be looking

465
the charter should be a limited one. The
main complaints were against Blunt and
T. A. R. I explained that in so far as
Blunt's relations with Mrs. Winterbottom
yere concerned, thesehad been agreed in a
letter which we had had from Felix. Felix
did not seem to remember the letter, and
Vov. did not know of its existence before
he made his enquiry. There was a further
complaint about a letter that blunt had
written to D.B. on the subject of CALVO.
This had been given purely as a background
so that in the very delicate operations
that D.B. was carrying out he would know
more about what he was doing, and see the
justification for the action required.
It was quite clear that all our communica-
tions to anybody outside Section V. were
being opened. I said I thought this was
regrettable and obviously indicated an
atmosphere of suspicion.
As regards T. A. R. there seemed to be one
case where it was perhaps unnecessary for hi
him to have rung up Dansey, as well as a
Viv. Viv's contention is that corres-
pondence of this kind only leads to delays
and confusion. I said that we did not wish
to depart from the main principle of the
charter. On the other hand we should like
it applied with rather more elasticity.
We did like to get into touch with the
actual people who were doing the work, since
it was only in this way that we could
improve our knowledge. Blunt's liaison
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

467
what was really a priveleged meeting, that t
the activities of SOE had led to the shoot-
ing of 25 agents. What he actually did
say, and he kept a note of the meeting,
was that the activities of SOE were of a
different kind to those of S.I.S. and
that itwas therefore necessary to keep
the lines clear since SOE by their violent
actions were exposed to counter-action by
the enemy which had in a number of cases
led to the rounding up in addition of SIS
agents. Bourdillon had telephoned a com-
plaint to the C.0. and a first class row
had resulted. The fact was that Bourdillon
was hand in glove with Wyngate the SOE man.
It is proposed that Stopford might be sent
to GIB. as DSO. If this were agreed to,
SIS would be quite prepared to tell
the Section v. man there to accept demands
for information direct from Stopford
and to seek his guidance, in C. E. matters.
I saw Stopford in the afternoon and
explained the position. He would I think
take on the job if pressed, but we all
felt that if there was going to be an
amalgamation of ourselves and Section V.
he would be invaluable here to assist in
building up our representation abroad.
If this failed, he could be extremely
useful as an inspector of our foreign
links.
At the request of J.C. I addressed the
Twenty Committee on the subject of the
Victoire case. I explained to them the
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

469
Ned Reid has brought me a letter which he
proposes to send to Felix, complaining that
in connection ith information passed to
us about certain banknotes, SIS have refused
to give us the necessary data, probably
because the information comes from XXX
sources. We nevertheless got a certain
way with the enquiry, when SIS told us
to drop it, without giving any reason.
As Ned rightly remarks, if notes are com:
into this country from abroad it is a mitte:
which concerns this office, and it for us
to decide whether enquiries should or should
not go on. I am putting this up to the
D.G.
Lennox tells me that malta has had one of
the heaviest raids since the beginning
of the war. The Germans employed 200 plane:
Two of our submarines were sunk in harbour
and one damaged. Six of our planes were
destpoyed on the ground and 7 others
damaged. There seems little doubt from
S.I.S. information that the Germans are
going to attempt to take Malta in the near
future. They have seriously damaged air
-fields and are obviously employing their
Crete tactics. it seems that the German
General Staff do not think thatnommel
can make his projected attack on the Suez
Canal until Malta is in German hinds.
Even then they seem to have misgivings,
but Hitler is confident. This attack is
to be combined with a drive to the Caucasus.
pubmarine "Urge" has done a good job
by torpedoing and sinking an Italian
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189
1 wor
cruise

471
position of Gibbs and Grogan Herbert said
that although he had no complaint against
Grogan he realised that Gibbs was by far
the better man. I told him what Gibbs
had said about the carrying out of our
work by representation at Censorship.
Gibbs thought the job could be run quite
easily by one man spending half his day
in this office and half at the Frudential.
He thought however that it would be
necessary to have a competent woman
assistant at the Prudential who would be
capable of weeding out the daily corres-
pondence and preparing it for the officer
when he visited the Prudential in the
afternoon. Gibbs thought it would also
be quite easy for the officer to represent
the interests of SI.$. at the same time.
Herbert agreed that Gibbs who was a
quicker worker than Grogan, would be able
to carry this job, but he doubted whether
Grogan could. Herbe t was very emphatic
that any attempt by S.I.S. to set up
their own representation in censorship
would be a tetrograde step. I gave him
a general picture of the situation here
from the point of view of espi na e and
told him that if there was any thing else
he wished to know he had only to ask me.
I explained that the information which
affected him most was probably in the
hands of S.I.S. and that we were under
some difficulty in representing them as
they put a ban on so much of the informa-
then that they received which was clearly
of importance to censorship. Herbert was
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

473
With reference to the first alternative,
I suggested that this section and its
rerpesentatives abroad should be seconded
to S.J.S. from the Security Service in
the same way that the military, naval and
air sections are seconded. In this way
we should have some say in the building
up of counter-espionage sections abroad
and in changing the personnel if they
were not satisfactory. The D. G. preferred
the first alternative as he felt that
it would get over the difficulty of the
introduction of a 3rd service on foreign
territory. Ine rump end of Section v..
and its representatives abroad would still
remain the servants of S.I.S. but we
should have closer or more direct access
to them since we should be communicating
with them direct.
There has been an interesting case of
suspected sabotage at Gib. A man went on
board one of our trawlers called Blossom
with a basket of eges. When he went away
several blocks of T.N.T. fused to go off
in about half an hour were found under
tne eggs. The matter was reported to
the Spanish police and one man named
Sanchez was arrested. ISOS disclosed that
a project had failed and that the ISOS
character Felipe had been arrested. The
eggs were addressed to someone called
HENRICKS in Gib. Three people of this name
are being interrogated.
Jock Whyte talked to me about the case of
Van HEULE. I have asked him to let me see
Cataloque Reference KV 7948gds his weekly schedule

นาง
there is an S.O.E. stition near Prestwick
whence the aeroplane took off.
April 8th
Clark of N.I.D. telephoned about a girl
called Sylvia SCHWEPPES of Onslow Court
Hotel, Queens Gate. This girl has told
Commander Cannon of N.I.D. that she has
been approached by some party to carry out
out propaganda in the sense that all
western nations should combine against
the Yellow Peril. She is prepared to
play up to these people if given advice.
I am told that the Felipe who was arrested
in connection with the egg-sabotage case
in Gib. was not the famous Felipe of ISOS.
I saw Stamp and asked him about Fascists.
He said that the released members of the
B.U.F. had been getting together on the
. question of support for the relatives of
other members or the organisation who were
interned. Not much money had been forth-
coming but the names and addresses of those
who were still active supporters of a
the movement were being brought to light."
Stamp had recently seen W.E.D. Allen who
has given him the full story of Mussolini's
subsidy to the Party. Allen one one
occasion went to Rome with DUNDAS. The
subsidy at that time was £5,000 per month.
the subsequent scheme for the transmission
of the funds through a broadcasting company
did not actually materialise. Our infor-
mation however was correct that a nominal
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

strategy in the light of the development
of the war in Europe and the Middle East.
and concluded that Germany's first major
offensive effort in 1942 would be
against Russia, and it will start in the
south, its objects being to defeat the
Russian armies and to get oil. By sub-
sidiary operations they will maintain and
intensify their attacks on allied shipping.
In particular they will attack the nort"
northern supply route to Russia by sea
an d air. She will also support her
forces in Libya to emable them to maintain
and exploit their position. They will
try and maintain their present air power
in the Mediterranean. Unless and until
$hey can defeat Russia, it is thought
unlikely that they will attempt an invasion
of the British Isles, an occupation of the
Iberian Peninsua and Swden or French North
or West Africa, an attack on Egypt through
Cyprus and Syria, an attack on Iraq and
Persia through vyprus and Syria, or surkey,
an attack on the Caucasus through turkey
or move into India unless Turkey acquiesces
It is tnought that wauan will aim at
(a) consolidating as quickly as possible
her East Asiatic sphere and completing it
by the occupation of Burma, achieving peace
in China, occupying bases in the S.W. Pacific
to cut the sea-route from America to
Australia and compelling us to dissipate
our troops and disperse our naval forces
by raids or threats of raids.
The J.I.C. have also made a careful review
of our bombing policy, which seems to
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

479
*he policy of bombing bottlenecks is
thought to beleven more vital now than
formerly since the Germans are today more
and more faced with necessity of delivering
straight from the factory to the front
line. The effect of such bombing on the war
on the Russian front is therefore of an
immediate kind.
Jim Hale came to see me again about
Miss SCIIWEPPES. He thinks her story is
true. Her employer is Sir Alfred Suenson-
Taylor, a big man in the insurance world.
He first asked her to 20 to America to
contact youth movements, but later said that
he could not arrange the necessary trans-
port. He then made the proposal that she
should carry out propaganda in both civil-
ian and military circles here in the sense
that we should be well advised to settle
the war in the west and combine with
the Germans against the Yellov Peril. Miss
SCHWEPPES is taking the job and hopes to
get 7 gns a week and her expenses. whe
will keep us informed of what happens.
I saw Archie Boyle in the afternoon.
He has a well placed agent in Denmark and
wanted to know whether we or the Twenty
Committee could supply him with any
information about our activities and those
of our allies which would strengthen the
morale of his colleagues. We both
agreed that this was rather more in C's line
of country and since C. had undertaken to
pass a copy of all such information to us
Catalogue ReferenceR17271 gross to the other side

481
TRAUSS, in Lisbon, import and export agents
might possibly be responsible for the Ostra
messages which appear on ISOS and give
grossly misleading inforation about
shipping movements from here, W. Africa
and the Middle East. TRAUSS has an
agent here, a Miss Paula WIDMAN, whose
husband was a member of the Nazi Farty in
1934 and who Ned discovered had been
receiving remittances through the banco
e Spirito Santo in Lisbon. She has a
stepson in West Africa. We know from
the censorship that Paula WIDMAN receives
information from TRAUSS in Lisbon and that
he is receiving letters from her. We have
however failed to intercept her corres-
pondence to him. Recently there has been
a further interesting link-up. HARTER
of the London Merchant Bank, through which
Giraffe received payment some time ago,
has now gone to reside with Paula WIDMAN.
The books of the London Merchant Bank
disclose that TRAUSS was one of their
clients. It looks as if we are on to
something here.
April 1lth
I saw the D.G. today on his meeting yester-
day with c. on the question of the amalgama
tion of Section V. with B. Division. "
apparently received him quite well and
thought the whole position should be
explored. He issued a caveat however on
the subject of building up agents abroad.
He said that he did not think it would be
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

421
that he had received a call from the D.M.I.
who was evidently slightly alarmed about
the note he had circulated to C. S.O.E.,
and ourselves. Findlater pointed out to
him that if he had been at all concerned
about the meeting he could have rung up but
that as he did not Findlater assumed
that he was in agrenent. D.M.I. seemed
to think that a mistake had been made
by drawing in S.O.E. and he was rather
worried about the Lord President's
interest. Findlater explained to him that
the Lord Fresident was his Minister and
that he therefore thought fit to refer the
matter to him before calling together the
interested parties. D.M.I. has probably
been pushed by the D.N.I.. There is now to
be a meeting of the W.Board at which
Findlater will read the minutes of the
meeting between the 3 Services
T. A.R. is leaving for the Middle East
on Monday. I am trying to get him per-
mission to take out certain ISOS and ISK
notes for Maunsell.
I saw Luke and told him that we proposea
to send him out to S. Africa. He seemed
quite pleased at the idea but stipulated
(a) that he should have military rank in
since anybody in civilian clothes would
be rather looked down upon by the British
community and (b) he wanted 'an increase
in his present pay as he would not be
able to supplement it with his own income
owing to currency restrictions. He said
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

THIS IS A COPY
ORIGINAL DOCUMENT RETAINED
IN DEPARTMENT UNDER SECTION
443
ACT 1958.
BLICOECORDS
200
Market affairs in more usefully the
centralised. We ourselves were in some
difficulty about passing any confidential
information if we did not know exactly
where itivas going and exactly how it it
was going to be handled. French tola
Victor that Crocker was doing certiin
work for them but that he had had certain
difficulties with word Woolton. Woolton
wanted him to come out in å blaze of
publicity and Crocker wished to operate
entirely under cover. Yoolton I think
thought that if he couid say that Crocker
pas in charge of food racketeering the
fact would have a deterrent effect.
Fersonally I tnink he is wrone and Crocker
is right, Victor suggested that possibly
Crocker might fill the post of co-ordinator
of all the Black Market activities, and
Co-operate with us. French is going to
discuss this matter with foolton.
April 13th
The Spanish Police appear to have arres
SUNDAE, whether on tieir own initiative
or on account of German pressure is not
clear. The police are appearing to be very
Co-operative but this is difficult to
reconcile with tie fact that the whole
area has been cleared of the civilian
population in the vicinity of Algeciras
in order to install some ne: infra red
apparatus which the Germans tre usine to
spot ships coming trough the Straits.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189rocontive in Cairo

486
At the moment nobody seems to be extracting
C.E. information and passing it either
to ourselves or to Section V. Section V.
have no contact with Deuxieme Bureaux
for this purpose and Dansey's people do
not pass on whatever they get. The D.G.
thinks this matter should form part of our
memo on the suggested amalgamation of
Section V. and B. Division.
The D.G. has given instructions for
samples of Duff to be shown personally
by "ebster to Smuts. Unfortunately we
had no samples except those addressed to
our own agents. the D.G. therefore directed
that the photographs only should be taken.
I haveimpressed both on Webster and Luke
that on no account should these photographs
be handed over to Smuts.
n man called WEBER is due to arrive here
in the guise of a Belgian diplomat. It
seems that he is being asked to come here
on some military mission. He is according
to ISOS a German agent carry ing secret
ink and also certiin instructions.
We are still awaiting a reply from Felix
about Bovril. I have sent him another
letter.
Tate has been ordered to pay Mutt £60 under
the Midas scheme. It is difficult to draw
any really positive conclusions although
it might be said that this is once more a
vote of confidence in Tate and perhaps
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

487
I have had the D.G.s reply to my memo about
Jock Why te This is in the sense that
our complaints against each other cancel
out and that therefore the whole matter
boils down to a personal issue aggravated
by the physical separation between the
Sections. I have talked to Toby who is
as puzzled as I am. There is no personal
issue on my side. I am merely embarrassed
by having an officer on the accuracy of
whose work I cannot rely and whom I am
unable to control owing to the physical
separation.
Webster and Luke are leaving early
tomorrow morning for ». Africa.
April 15th
Dick saw Felix last night when he discussed
the amalgamation plan. Felix though guarded
did not seem to be hostile.
Admiral Tottenham called and had a discussi
with the D. G. , Harry Allan, Victor and
my self. He has been going round all the
ports with a view to organising some
sort of defence against any thing in the
nature of a raid. He is quite certain
that something of the kind should be done
and if he gets a mandate will go ahead.
He has been in close touch with S.C.O.s,
who feel the need for some physical pro-
tection as distinct from ordinary security
measures.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

189
achieving his goal of impregnability
this year. The first alternative could be
accomplished only by successful invasion
of the European continent and this to any
extent is regarded as almost impossible
by American and British military authoritie
until 1943. They therefore regard the
best course as (1) quick and effective aid
to Russia, (2) the maintenance or aquisition
of bridgeheads to Europe on the N.
African coast. If Egypt can be held
the conditions for an allied offensive
in Euppe are immeasurably improved.
(3) Aid to China and the Dutch in an
effort to prevent the denial of far eastern
oil to the allies and the opening of
shipping lanes between Japan and German
controlled areas. Of paramount importance
to the objectives outlined above is the
giving of shipbuiding high priority in
our production programme.
T. A. R. is leaving for Lagos and has asked
us to facilitate his journey onwards.
Cass tells me that last night a
successful operation was carried out
on a tanker lying off or in Boulogne
harbour. Two men approached the vessel
in a canoe and attached limpets. Photo-
graphs show that she had 6 tugs round her
and was being beached.
Our Fleet in the eastern Mediterranean
is now based on East Africa. Trincomalee
has apparently been abandoned as a base.
The P.M. had given Somerville discretion in
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

han
whose work I was not satisfied and nothing
was being done to mitigate the difficulties
of physical separation, except a su gestion
difficult to carry out that I should visit
Blenheim more often. Apart from this I
thought there was a certain disciplinary
side to the whole question and that if some.
body did not tell Jock Whyte exactly where
he got off he would be intolerable. Charles
said he would speak to the D.G. Over O
the weekend.
April 17th
Spent the morning at the Planning Committee
We seemed to get more matters settled
although they were not of very great
importance. I am afraid we did no plan-
ing. I discussed afterwards with V.V.
the question of our amalgamation with
Section V. He told me that he had heard
about it from C. but that he had not got a
very clear picture as to what was intended.
He had been a little atarmed by a statement
of the D.G. to the effect that he was
proposing to take the matter very his
high. I said that as far as I knew the
D.G. intended if he possibly could to settl
it on his own level. I had particularly
urged him to do this as I felt sure that
starting on high levels never got one any -
where. V.V did not seem to be opposed to
the scheme although he thought that it
presented considerable administrative
difficulties. He told me that he and
Felix had discussed it at some length
when they were at the
Catalogue Referencer evi&/189e height of their

443
being despatched today.
D.G. spoke to me about Jock Why te. He was
rather heated and made up his mind and did
not seem to want to listen very much to
what I had to say. I told him that I had
been a little worried by the fact that he
seemed to regard the whole matter as a
personal issue between my self ind Jock
Whyte. I assured him that this was
not so. I explained to him that I
had shown my memo to Toby Pilcher before
submitting it in order that he might
verify the facts and let me know wether
he thought I hid been in any way unfair
in my criticisms. He had told me that he
thought that every thin I had said was
justified. I suggested to the D.G. that
perhaps he might like to have a word with
Toby Pilcher. He said that he did not
think it would serve any useful purpose
to continue discussions about the matter.
I explained to him that my views about
Jock why te were similar to those of every
other officer who had had any close connec-
tion with his work. He was inclined
to say that people expressed views of this
kind but did not really know what they
were talking about. I could see that he
had made up his mind and I confined myself
in the end to saying that if he wished
me to retain Jock Whyte in the Division
I would do my best to look after him but
that I didn't felt considerable anxiety
in doing so. I urged the D.G. to speak to
him rather seriously about his behaviour
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

495
Medlam arrived from Gib. but I have not
yet seen him. Burt has produced a
possible candidate for D.S.O. iſ Medlam
is thinking of resigning.
I saw the security film "Next of Kin" last
night. It is extremely well done but
unfortunately there is an Irishman who
features as a German courier. I am going
to try and set this part cut if the film
is to be for general circulation.
Medlam told me later about his cyphers. He
is worried about the position since
S.I.S. use a code within a code for both
their telegrams and for their written
communications. It sometimes happens
that when he has to send the report
both to us and to Section V. that the
identical information is sent in the same
bag, in the case of Section V. it is
encoded and in our letter it is en clair.
This might be serious if one of our planes
happened to make a forced landing in
pain or Portugal. Medlam says that his
correspondence comes by the direct
route whereas as far as I can see we
never know whether ours po by direct
route or via Lisbon or Madrid. I told
Medlam to makeout a memo on the subject
and to send it to Malcolm cumming with a
copy to my self.
Milmo talked to me about the case of
PALLETIER. It seems that this man was
instructed to work his way into the
Catalogue keference: KV447189 he Deuxieme Bureau

497
from 500-1,000 yards, the Swordfish has an
opportunity of turning off and so avoiding
the fire of the flak on board the ship it i
is attacking. The faster craft are obliged
to fly over the ship. Swordfish and okuas
can be used very effectively as dive-
bombers and were so used in Libya. The
only trouble is that we have not got
enough of them.
April 20th
Jock Whyte came to see me about the Van
HEULE case, which does not seem to be
making much progress. I said that while
the circumstances were curious I was
rather inclined to think that if van
HEULE had really been a spy he would not
have disclosed his alias of HEAVINGSTONE
to our Consul in Ostend when he wished to
get some of his baggage over to Belgium
from this country. He had asked the consul
to assist him in this matter but when it
came to filling in forms he told the Con-
sul that these forms would not succeea. in
releasing his property since he had user
the name of HEAVINGSTONE while in Englanu.
Van 1EULE is to be kept under observation
if and when he moves from one place to
another for a period of a week or so and
if nothing transpires he will be pulled in
and nuestioned.
I lunched with Anthony POLLEN who is going
as assistant manager to Harland Shortes
of Belfast. I said I thought he could
usefully have a word with certain people
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

499
almost verbatim a copy of the message sent
from London to Madrid on 10th April
Medlam spent last night at Tring, when he
and Victor had a long conversation about
their cases. The set-up in southern
Spain has become highly complicated and
I was on the whole impressed by the way
Medlam seemed to have the details more or
less at his finger-tips. I do not of a
course know how far he gets his leg
pulled by the various agents whom he
is controlling.
J.c. and Marriott have written long notes
about the future of thw Twenty Committee,
in the light of the Victoire transmitter
and sets of its kind. J.C. is I think a
little inclined to lose sight of the
orginal purpose for which the Snow net-
work was set up, namely to prevent pene-
tration in this country of enemy agents,
to collect information about the enemy
intelligence system and to bring over
other agents who can either be controlled
or liquidated. All these aspects are pr -
purely counter-espionage ones and there-
fore can only be directed by the Security
Service. It is true however that it was
always envisaged that this network could
perform the auxiliary function of misleading
the enemy on a large scale in time of
invasion and on a small scale in more
normal times. They had in fact been used
for deception in regard to Norway. A
new situation arises through the intro-
duction of a transmitter with which we
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

Cecil has put up an interesting report on
Henry LUNDBORG Or LONDBORG who has just got
himself two years imprisonment and a fine
in N. Ireland. This man is a British subject
who has resided in Belfast all his life.
He was travelling as a restaurint car
assistant betveen Dublin and Belfast.
When arrested at the frontier three docu-
ments were found in his sock, from the
IRA Dublin to the IRA Belfast. One
was from Sean HARRINGTON, chief of Staff
and two others to Sean MCCOOL, Adjutant Gen.
eral and acting D. of I. These were addresse
to MCNAMEE @ Peter DONNELLY, the chief
representative of the IRA in N. Ireland,
who has since been arrested. LUNDBORG'S
work nad previously been carried out by a
man called LAWLOR whowas also a restaurant
car attendant. The documents were collected
at Kingston's Drapery Store in Dublin, which
is owned by the BRUGHA family. the father
was shot in the 1916 revolution. He was
an Englishman and his real name was BURGESS.
his family seem to have remained staunchly
I.R.A. ever since, and one of his sons
has been under detention for some time. I
The documents were carried by LUNDBORG ter
LA"LOR who gaven them to MCNAMEE. They
referred to details about the forces in
N. Ireland particularly the American Forces,
and to the nature of defence works at power
stations and factories. There was nothing
to show positively that this information
was required for the Germans but there is
at least a strong inference that this was
so.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

423
on a matter concerning which he was
almost certainly to be in disagreement.
I spent nearly an hour and a half with
Viv. who seemed very aggrieved about the
whole business. He obviously thought
that we should have gone to Section V.
for a note on ISOS material affecting
the MiddleEast, but he ascertained on the
telephone that Section V, nad no
Purple Primer for the Middle East and
since Egypt was supposed to be our
territory it seemed only natural that
T.A.R. before goingthere would consult
any section of his own office who might
be concerned. I pointed out to Viv.
that as things were at present we were
supposed to be responsible for counter-
espionage in the Middle East but that
we had not the slightest idea what the
Middle East was being sent. In the early
stages the sending of ISOS material had
been left to SIS. Now the practicewas for
us to suggestcertain messages as being
suitable for transmission to the Middle
East, but these suggestions were never
very well received. We had absolutely
nothing on paper to show what Maunsell
knew and what he didn't know. We had
asked for copies of the messages sent to
him but we had never received them.
This was a matter which we had on the
agenda for our Planning Committee, but
unfortunately there had not yet been time
to discuss it. Personally I did not see
how the D.G. could be responsible for
C-E work in the Middle East if he did
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

"Arctic" and the shore transmitter for
strategical deception.
april 21st
Charles told me that the D.G. had seen Jock
Why te in his presence and had given
him a rather firm raspberry both as
regards the alleged inaccuracy of his work
and the fact that he had been talking
about me and others in a derogatory way.
He wished however that the slate should
be wiped clean and that we should start
again.
I attended the D.G.meeting at which there
was a discussion on internal and military
security. Toby, Theo and Harry Allen were
in favour of putting an end to this
distinction by some arrangement which
would ensure that all these cases went to
one place in the first instance. There
was a good deal of acid comment on Allex's
hair-splitting arguments which nearly
always ended in the case being bucketea
about from one section to another
before any real action was started.
The fact is that Alex's section which has
no less than 6 officers, ought to be
liquidated and he ought to retire. One
of his officers should go to the Fascist
Section, another to the Communist Section
and a third should act as liaison wth
the Military. The services of theremainder
should be dispensed with. The D.G. has
ordered that the whole uestion should be
looked into.
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

508
in charge of a combined operations raid
on the French coast which is to embark
from Dover has been approached by a local
representative of the "Evening News". the
raid did actually start on Saturday but
came back owing to unfavourable weather
conditions. The "Evening News" represen-
titive asked the Security Officerwhether
the operation had been successful. When
asked how he knew he said that he had
got it from his editor, Suhr, in London.
I discussed this matter with Cussen. It
seemed to me that we should first ascertain
(1) whether C.C.O. wished is to take this
matter up now or after the raid had taken
place, and secondly whether action against
the paper would have the approval of
higher authority.
April 22nd
Blunt came to see me about the cases of
GRAUER and COLLON. As regards the former
we have practically no starting points.
There is first of all the delicacy of
the position vis a vis the Soviet Govt.
secondly the difficulty of a servation
on the Soviet Embassy, thirdly the lack
of special material or B.J.s. We therefore
decided to concentrate on COLLON with
special facilities. Having sized him up
we can decide whether we make a direct
approach or not.
Victor came to talk to me about the
Sikorski case. I said that I hardly tough
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

507
SULZER. Sinclair will be put au fait with
the situation, and will report to us his
impression of the interview.
D.G. talked to Medlam in my presence
about his position at Gib. He asked Medlam
quite frankly whether he thou ht he would
be able to continue his post as DSO in the
light of the various difficulties that has
had encountered and for which he was
not really responsible. Medlam said he
thought he could carry the work with
some assistance either as a civilian or
as a soldier. He thought however that
the correct set-up would be for him to
be a civilian with a military and naval
representative attached to his staff. Per-
somally I think this is risht thou ht
whether Medlam can now make the change
is another matter. The D.G. told him
that he was proposing to send a telegram
to Gort asking whether in the event of
Medlam's return he would have the wovernor':
support. It seemed desirable to do this
in order to clear the air.
The D.G. Saw Frost and myself on the
question of Frost's various difficulties
with R.S.S. The D.G. did not seem to think
that anything in the nature of a general
protest was desirable. ne preferred to
take up individual cases as and when they
arose. Frost seems to me to be singularly
undecided when it comes to the point.
He is loud in protestations about the
iniquitieses of R.S.S. and about our
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

509
Field-hobinson came to see me in the
afternoon about his agent who was sucdess-
fully launched off the Norwegian coast
under favourable conditions. He told me
that he intended to work on the labour
population in neutral countries wno
were being sent to Germany.
I saw Medhurst in the evening in an
endeavour to get suitable air transport
for Stopford from the Clyde to Iceland.
Medhurst said that the air Ministry had
no operational control ofver the Fleet
Air Arm but that he felt sure that if the
C. in c. thought the project was a good
one he would whistle up an aircraft from
Coastal Command.
April 24th
I went with the D.G. to see Casey who
is leaving for the Middle East on Wednesday.
He seemed in grand form and as usual was
thirsting for knowledge. The D.G.. gave
him a general picture of our responsibil-
ities and of intelligence in the Middle
East. Casey said that arrangements had
been made by Dick Ellis to become a member
of his staff for the purpose of intelli ence
liaison with the Americans.
Fulford called to see me about the
SCHWEPPES case. I told him that neither
Jim Hale nor I had any feelings about
who ran it but that we both were strongly
of the opinion that whoever controlled
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

that in all their auarrels there was one
consideration which did not seem to have
crossed their minds. That was the future
of France. This appears to have almost
reduced them both to tears. He of course
saw them separately and convey ed his
findings to the P.M. When I was coming
back with him in a taxi he was loud in
his praises of Brookie whom he thought
was one of the most likeable, most inte
-ligent and most incorruptible of men
that he had ever met. He told me that Joe
Ball when he took over films at the M.O. I.
tried to get rid of Brookie and from what
he said I rather assume that Ball had tried
to make something on the side and had come
upnagainst Brookie. Tyrell told me it
had taken him 3months to get rid of Ball
but he had eventually achieved his object.
Tyrell also expressed very strong views
about the control of allied intelligence
services and security services by the
British. He knew all about the MUSELIER
business and he was quite cert in that
we should make a strong bid for the control
of the foreign services on the grounds
that it was in allied interests, that they we
were operating on British soil and that
therefore they must collaborate with
the local authorities.
Cussen and Cecil came to see me about
Luke's half-brother, who has got himself
into a mess in Ireland. He had apparently
rung Marriott before going over on a
business matter and had asked whether he
Catalogue Reference:KV/4/189

